Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.200

Regular or special meetings of the board.

(1) The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

(2) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, any or all directors may participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating can hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

[ 1989 c 165 s 91.]